bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Спортни светлини и предпазни светлоотразители > Предпазни светлоотразители: LED светлоотразителни ленти; Светлоотразителни колани и каишки; Светлоотразителни спрейове и бои; Светлоотразителни стикери и декорации
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Feux et réflecteurs de sécurité pour le sport > Réflecteurs de sécurité pour le sport: Brassards réfléchissants à LED; Ceintures et harnais réfléchissants; Sprays et peintures réfléchissants; Autocollants et adhésifs réfléchissants
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Säkerhetslampor och -reflexer för sportande > Säkerhetsreflexer för sportande: Reflekterande LED-armband; Reflexbälten och reflexselar; Reflexsprej och reflexfärg; Reflexklistermärken och dekaler
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 运动安全灯/反光装置 > 运动安全反光装置: LED 反光臂带; 反光腰带与反光背心; 反光喷雾与反光漆; 反光贴纸与反光贴花
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Sportiniai saugos žibintai ir atšvaitai > Sportiniai saugos atšvaitai: LED atspindinčios rankovės; Šviesą atspindintys diržai ir petnešos; Atspindintys purškikliai ir dažai; Atspindintys lipdukai ir dekoratyviniai lipdukai
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > スポーツ用セーフティーライト・リフレクター > スポーツ用セーフティリフレクター: LED反射アームバンド; 反射ベルト・ハーネス; 反射スプレー・ペイント; 反射ステッカー・デカール
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Športna varnostna svetila in odsevniki > Športni varnostni odsevniki: LED odsevni trakovi za roke; Odsevni pasovi in naramnice; Odsevni spreji in barve; Odsevne nalepke in okrasni dodatki
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Sport biztonsági lámpák és fényvisszaverők > Sport fényvisszaverők: LED-es fényvisszaverő karszalagok; Fényvisszaverő övek és hámok; Fényvisszaverő spray-k és festékek; Fényvisszaverő matricák
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Đèn an toàn & phản xạ thể thao > Đồ vật phản xạ an toàn thể thao: Băng đeo tay phản quang LED; Thắt lưng & đai phản quang; Bình xịt & sơn phản quang; Miếng dán & decal phản quang
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Turvavalot ja heijastimet urheiluun > Heijastimet urheiluun: Heijastavat LED-käsivarsinauhat; Heijastinvyöt ja -valjaat; Heijastinsuihkeet ja -maalit; Heijastintarrat
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Bezpečnostní sportovní světla a odrazky > Bezpečnostní sportovní odrazky: Reflexní LED pásky na ruku; Reflexní pásky a kšandy; Reflexní spreje a barvy; Reflexní samolepky a nálepky
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Refletores e luzes de segurança para esportes > Refletores de segurança para esportes: Braçadeiras refletivas de LED; Cintos e coletes refletivos; Sprays e tintas refletivas; Adesivos e decalques refletivos
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 運動安全燈具/反光配件 > 運動安全反光配件: LED 反光臂帶; 反光腰帶與背帶; 反光噴霧與塗料; 反光貼紙與貼花
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Športové bezpečnostné svetlá a reflektory > Športové bezpečnostné reflektory: LED reflexné náramky; Reflexné pásy a postroje; Reflexné spreje a farby; Reflexné nálepky a samolepky
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Φώτα ασφαλείας και ανακλαστήρες για αθλητισμό > Ανακλαστήρες ασφαλείας: Ανακλαστικά περιβραχιόνια LED; Ανακλαστικές ζώνες και ιμάντες; Ανακλαστικά σπρέι και μπογιές; Ανακλαστικά αυτοκόλλητα
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Sikkerhedslys og reflekser til sport > Reflekser til sport: Refleksarmbånd med LED; Refleksbælter og -seler; Refleksspray og -maling; Refleksklistermærker og -mærkater
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 스포츠 안전등/반사기 > 스포츠 안전 반사기: LED 반사 암밴드; 반사 벨트 및 하네스; 반사 스프레이 및 페인트; 반사 스티커 및 데칼
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > ไฟและตัวสะท้อนแสงเพื่อความปลอดภัยในการเล่นกีฬา > ตัวสะท้อนแสงเพื่อความปลอดภัยในการเล่นกีฬา: ปลอกแขนสะท้อนแสง LED; เข็มขัดและสายรัดสะท้อนแสง; สเปรย์และสีสะท้อนแสง; สติกเกอร์และรูปลอกสะท้อนแสง
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Sport Safety Lights & Reflectors > Sport Safety Reflectors: LED Reflective Armbands; Reflective Belts & Harnesses; Reflective Sprays & Paints; Reflective Stickers & Decals
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Sportska sigurnosna svjetla i reflektori > Sportski sigurnosni reflektori: LED reflektirajuće trake za ruku; Reflektirajući pojasevi i remenje; Reflektirajući sprejevi i boje; Reflektivne naljepnice
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Sicherheitslichter & -reflektoren für Sport > Sicherheitsreflektoren für Sport: LED-Leuchtarmbänder; Leuchtgürtel & -geschirre; Reflexionssprays & -farben; Reflektierende Aufkleber
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Luci e catarifrangenti per la sicurezza sportiva > Riflettori di sicurezza sportiva: Fasce da braccio riflettenti a LED; Cinture e pettorine riflettenti; Spray e vernici riflettenti; Adesivi e decalcomanie riflettenti
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Lumini și reflectoare de siguranță pentru sport > Reflectoare de siguranță pentru sport: Brățări reflectorizante cu LED; Centuri și hamuri reflectorizante; Sprayuri și vopsele reflectorizante; Stickere și autocolante reflectorizante
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Sportlampjes en reflectoren > Reflectoren: Reflecterende ledarmbanden; Reflecterende riemen en harnassen; Reflecterende sprays en verf; Reflecterende stickers en decals
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Sportowe światła i reflektory zabezpieczające > Sportowe reflektory zabezpieczające: Odblaskowe opaski LED; Pasy i szelki odblaskowe; Spreje i farby odblaskowe; Naklejki odblaskowe
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Светящиеся и светоотражающие аксессуары для занятий спортом > Светоотражающие аксессуары для занятий спортом: Светодиодные нарукавники; Светоотражающие пояса и портупеи; Светоотражающие спреи и краски; Светоотражающие наклейки
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Spor Güvenlik Işıkları ve Reflektörler > Spor Güvenliği Reflektörleri: LED reflektörlü kolluklar; Reflektörlü kemerler ve askılar; Reflektörlü sprey ve boyalar; Reflektörlü çıkartmalar ve etiketler
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Sportssikkerhetslys og -reflektorer > Sportssikkerhetsreflektorer: Refleksbånd med LED; Refleksbelter og refleksseler; Refleksspray og refleksmaling; Refleksklistremerker
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Reflectores y luces de seguridad deportivos > Reflectores deportivos de seguridad: Brazaletes reflectantes LED; Cinturones y arneses reflectantes; Sprays y pinturas reflectantes; Calcomanías y pegatinas reflectantes
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Refletores e luzes de segurança para desporto > Refletores de segurança para desporto: Braçadeiras refletoras LED; Cintos e arneses refletores; Tinta e sprays refletores; Autocolantes refletores